Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 General Provisions
66-11-143. Protection from unrecorded lien claims — Notice of completion — Expiration of lien rights — Form of notice of completion.

In order to be protected from lien claims that have not previously been recorded, as provided in § 66-11-111 or § 66-11-112, the owner or purchaser of improved real property or their agent or attorney may, upon the completion of the improvement, record in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the real property or any affected part of the real property is located a notice of completion, or the owner or purchaser may require a person or organization with whom the owner or purchaser has contracted for the improvement to do so upon the completion of the improvement, and the owner or purchaser of improved real property or any other authorized party shall simultaneously serve a copy of any notice of completion recorded with the register of deeds on the prime contractor; provided, however, that no copy of the notice of completion is required to be served on any prime contractor when the owner, or an entity controlled by the owner, also acts as the general contractor, as defined in § 66-11-146(b)(1), in furtherance of the improvement to the property. If a prime contractor is entitled to be served with a copy of any notice of completion recorded with the register of deeds, then the lien rights of the prime contractor not so served a copy shall not be affected by the notice of completion.

The notice of completion shall contain the following:

The legal name of the owner or owners of the real property;

The name of the prime contractor or prime contractors;

The location and description of the real property;

Date of the completion of the improvement;

A statement that a transfer of ownership of all or a part of the real property or an interest in the real property and encumbrance on the real property, or a settlement of the claims of parties entitled to the benefits of this part, will take place not less than ten (10) days after the date of the recording of the notice of completion; provided, that the ten-day expiration for lien claimants shall only apply to contracts for improvement to or on real property, for one-family, two-family, three-family and four-family residential units. On all other contracts for improvement to or on real property, the expiration time for lien claimants shall be thirty (30) days after the date of the recording of the notice of completion in the register's office;

The name and address of the person, firm, or organization on which parties entitled to the benefits of this chapter may serve notice of claim;

Acknowledgment by the person filing the notice, or by that person's agent or attorney; and

The name and address of the preparer of the instrument in compliance with § 66-24-115.

The register of deeds shall make a permanent record of all notices of completion filed in the office of the register and the records shall be available for public examination. The register of deeds shall be entitled to the fees, provided in § 8-21-1001, for the register's services in receiving and maintaining notices of completion required in this section.

If a remote contractor has served a required notice of nonpayment pursuant to § 66-11-145, then any party recording a notice of completion shall simultaneously serve a copy of the notice of completion on the remote contractor. The remote contractor shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the recording of the notice of completion to serve a written notice in response to the notice of completion in accordance with subsection (e). The lien rights of a remote contractor that has not been served a copy, shall not be affected by the notice of completion.

Any prime contractor or remote contractor claiming a lien under this chapter on the property described in the notice of completion, who has not previously registered the person's contract as provided in § 66-11-111 or registered a sworn statement as provided in § 66-11-112 and served a copy of the registration to the owner, shall serve written notice, addressed to the person, firm or organization and at the address designated in the notice of completion for receiving notice of claim, stating the amount of the claim and certifying that the claim does not include any amount owed to the claimant on any other job or under any other contract.

For improvements to or on real property for one-family, two-family, three-family and four-family residential units, the written notice shall be served not more than ten (10) days from the date of the recording of the notice of completion in the register's office, and if notice is not served within that time, the lien rights of the claimant shall expire.

For all other contracts for improvements to or on real property, the written notice shall be served not more than thirty (30) days from the date of the recording of the notice of completion in the register's office, and if notice is not served within that time, the lien rights of the claimant shall expire.

Any notice of completion recorded as provided in this section before the completion of the improvement or the demolition is void and of no effect whatsoever.

The notice of completion may be in substantially the following form:

This Instrument prepared by:

Name

Address

NOTICE OF COMPLETION

Legal name of owner or owners of the real property:

Names of all applicable prime contractors:

The location and description of the real property:

Date of completion of the entire improvement:

A transfer of ownership of all or part of the real property or an interest therein and encumbrance thereon or a settlement of the claims of parties entitled to the benefits of Title 66, Chapter 11 of the Tennessee Code Annotated will take place not less than ten (10) days after the date of the recording of this Notice of Completion; provided, that the ten-day expiration for lien claimants shall only apply to contracts for improvements to or on real property for one-family, two-family, three-family, and four-family residential units. On all other contracts for improvement to or on real property, the expiration time for lien claimants shall be thirty (30) days after the date of the recording of this Notice of Completion. The name and address of the person, firm, or organization on which parties entitled to the benefits of Title 66, Chapter 11, may serve notice is as follows:

Name:

Street Address:

City:

State: Zip Code:

Dated this the day of , 20

Signature

(Check One)

, Owner

, Purchaser

, Prime Contractor

[Notary Acknowledgment]

Acts 1975, ch. 307, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., §§ 64-1145 — 64-1147; Acts 1985, ch. 83, § 1; 1990, ch. 854, § 6; 2007, ch. 189, § 42; 2008, ch. 811, §§ 1-4.

Cross-References. Notice of nonpayment, §66-11-145.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-708, 8-709.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, §§ 14, 15.

Law Reviews.

1990 Legislation Affecting Tennessee Real Estate Practice (William R. Bruce), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 18 (1990).

66-11-144. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-11-144 (Acts 1975, ch. 345, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 64-1148 — 64-1151; Acts 1985, ch. 340, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 551, § 9; 2007, ch. 189, § 43; 2007, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2), concerning the retention of a portion of a contract price in escrow, was transferred to §66-34-104 by Acts 2008, ch. 804, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

66-11-145. Notice of nonpayment — Form of notice.

Every remote contractor with respect to an improvement, except one-family, two-family, three-family and four-family residential units, shall serve, within ninety (90) days of the last day of each month within which work or labor was provided or materials, services, equipment, or machinery furnished and for which the remote contractor intends to claim a lien under this chapter, a notice of nonpayment for the work, labor, materials, services, machinery, or equipment to the owner and prime contractor in contractual privity with the remote contractor if its account is, in fact, unpaid. The notice shall contain:

The name of the remote contractor and the address to which the owner and the prime contractor in contractual relation with the remote contractor may send communications to the remote contractor;

A general description of the work, labor, materials, services, equipment, or machinery provided;

The amount owed as of the date of the notice;

A statement of the last date the claimant performed work and/or provided labor or materials, services, equipment, or machinery in connection with the improvements; and

A description sufficient to identify the real property against which a lien may be claimed.

A remote contractor who fails to provide the notice of nonpayment in compliance with this section shall have no right to claim a lien under this chapter, except this section shall not apply to a certain amount or percentage of the contract amount retained to guarantee performance of the remote contractor.

A notice of nonpayment provided in accordance with this section shall not be considered notice required by § 66-11-115.

The notice of nonpayment may be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF NONPAYMENT TO: [Owner] [Contractor contracting w/ Owner] Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §66-11-145, notice is hereby given that [Lienor] has not been paid for certain labor, materials, services, equipment, or machinery it supplied in the [description of work] of the [description of project], located at [description of property]. The amount presently due and owing is $ . The last date labor, materials, services, equipment, or machinery were provided in connection with the improvements was [date]. You may send any communications regarding this matter to the following name and address: Lienor Dated:

Click to view NOTICE OF NONPAYMENT

Acts 1990, ch. 854, § 1; 1996, ch. 884, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 568, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 189, § 44.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-711.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of retroactive application of an amendment concerning requirements for perfecting liens, OAG 96-051, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (3/19/96).

66-11-146. “Residential real property” defined — “General contractor” defined — Liens on residential real property.

As used in this subsection (a), “residential real property” means a building consisting of one (1) dwelling unit in which the owner of the real property intends to reside or resides as the owner's principal place of residence, including improvements to or on the parcel of property where the residential building is located, and also means a building consisting of two (2), three (3) or four (4) dwelling units where the owner of the real property intends to reside or resides in one (1) of the units as the owner's principal place of residence, including improvements to or on the parcel of property where the residential building is located.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except as provided in subsection (b), on contracts to improve residential real property, a lien or right of lien on the property shall exist only in favor of a prime contractor.

As used in this subsection (b):

“Residential real property” means improvements to or on a parcel of property upon which a building is constructed or is to be constructed consisting of one (1) dwelling unit intended as the principal place of residence of a person or family; and

“General contractor” means the person responsible for the supervision or performance of substantially all of the work, labor, and the furnishing of materials in furtherance of the improvement to the property.

When the owner of residential real property and the general contractor are one and the same person, or a person controls entities owning the property and a general contracting business, a lien or right of lien upon the property shall exist only in favor of the lienors in contractual privity with the owner or general contractor.

Acts 1990, ch. 735, § 1; 1990, ch. 854, § 8; 1991, ch. 280, § 1; 2007, ch. 189, § 45; 2008, ch. 811, §§ 5, 6.

Cross-References. Mechanics and materialmen's liens, residential real property, right of lien, §66-11-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-701.

66-11-147. Liens on gas, oil or other mineral leaseholds.

Any person who performs labor or furnishes materials, supplies, fixtures, machinery or other things of value to a lessee holding or owning a leasehold, or any right conferred by a lease, relating to oil, gas or other minerals, in the development or improvement of the leasehold, by contract with or by the written consent of the owner or the agent or representative of the owner of the leasehold, shall have a lien on the leasehold or the entire interest of the lessee, including oil or gas wells, machinery and equipment, to secure the payment for the labor or things furnished. If the labor or things are furnished at the written request or by written consent of any prime contractor or remote contractor, or the agent of either, the lien shall be for the benefit of whomever furnishes any of the labor or things mentioned. The lien provided for in this section shall be effective against the leasehold, or the entire interest of the lessee, including all improvements belonging to the lessee.

The lien shall relate to and take effect from the time of the delivery of the materials, supplies, fixtures, or machinery, or from the date of furnishing of any labor.

If unpaid, the lien shall expire and be of no effect after ninety (90) days, unless the person furnishing the labor, materials, or supplies, files with the register's office in the county in which the leasehold is located, the sworn statement as provided in § 66-11-112. A copy of the notice shall also be served to the owner of the property and the holder of the leasehold.

A lien provided in this section shall have precedence over all other subsequent liens or conveyances after the time of attachment; provided, that the sworn statement is filed within the ninety-day period provided in this section.

Section 66-11-120 shall apply to this lien.

Acts 2006, ch. 654, § 1; 2007, ch. 189, § 46.

66-11-148. Construction of chapter — Jurisdiction of courts to enforce — Errors and omissions.

This chapter is to be construed and applied liberally to secure the beneficial results, intents, and purposes of the chapter.

Substantial compliance with this chapter is sufficient for the validity of liens arising under this chapter and to give jurisdiction to the court to enforce the liens.

Any document required or permitted to be served, recorded or filed by this chapter that substantially satisfies the applicable requirements of this chapter is effective even if it has nonprejudicial errors or omissions.

Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 47.

66-11-149. Presumption of correctness of information on building permit — Service on listed agents or owners — Method of service — Presumption of complete service.

For purposes of § 66-11-145, the name of any owner, the owner's agent, any prime contractor, any remote contractor, or any other person, their addresses, and the real property description stated in a building permit authorizing the improvement shall be presumed to be correct and, in the case of property description, sufficient to identify the real property.

If one (1) or more agents are specified on the building permit, service on a listed agent shall be deemed to be service on all of the agent's principals, including those who have not separately listed an agent. If one (1) or more owners are specified on the building permit, service on the listed owner or owners shall be deemed to be service on all owners, including those not listed.

For the purposes of this chapter, except as provided in § 66-11-108, any notice or other document required or permitted to be served shall be served by one (1) or more of the following means:

Registered or certified mail, return receipt requested;

Hand delivery, evidenced by a sworn statement, properly notarized, confirming delivery; or

Any other commercial delivery service that provides written confirmation of delivery.

For purposes of this chapter, there is a rebuttable presumption that service is complete:

Upon receipt by the party being served by hand delivery;

Within three (3) business days of mailing if served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested; or

One (1) business day after commercial, overnight delivery if served by that means.

Acts 2007, ch. 189, § 48; 2008, ch. 811, § 7.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

66-11-150. Prohibited liens.

Notwithstanding any law in this chapter or any other law to the contrary, no lien, otherwise authorized pursuant to this chapter, shall be available on residential real property, as that term is defined by §66-11-146(b)(1)(A), to any person, firm or corporation that performs residential construction, including home improvement as defined by §62-6-501(4), if:

The person, firm or corporation is not licensed pursuant to title 62, chapter 6; and

The jurisdiction in which the work is performed requires such person, firm or corporation to be licensed in accordance with such chapter.

Acts 2010, ch. 749, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 749, § 2, provided that the act, which enacted the section, shall apply to any liens filed for residential construction and home improvement services performed on or after July 1, 2010.